Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 12
Employment of Children in Entertainment Industry

Effective Dates.

Acts 1987, No. 647, § 7: Apr. 4, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an immediate need to allow for the employment of children in the entertainment industry and to establish conditions for their employment. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-12-101. Purpose.

The General Assembly finds that the employment of minor children in the entertainment industry is necessary to create realistic theatrical, motion picture, radio, and television productions and to promote industry and economic growth. The purpose of this chapter is to provide minor children and the community with opportunities in the entertainment industry not heretofore provided.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 647, § 1.

11-12-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

[Repealed.]

“Employ” means to use the services of an individual in any remunerative occupation; and

“Entertainment industry” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or group of persons using the services of a child under sixteen (16) years of age in motion picture productions, television or radio productions, theatrical productions, modeling productions, horse shows, rodeos, and musical performances.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 647, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5398.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed the defined term “director”.

11-12-103. Penalty.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who violates a provision of this chapter or a lawful rule promulgated under this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty in accordance with the provisions of § 11-6-103.

Any person who willfully or intentionally violates the provisions of this chapter or a lawful rule promulgated under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

Each day that the violation continues shall be deemed a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 647, § 5; 1991, No. 509, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 842.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a) and (b)(1).

11-12-104. Restrictions on employment.

A child under sixteen (16) years of age may be employed in the entertainment industry, and the provisions of §§ 11-6-101 — 11-6-111, with respect to child labor, shall not be applicable to the employment of child actors as authorized in this chapter.

No child under sixteen (16) years of age may be employed in the entertainment industry:

In a role or in an environment deemed to be hazardous or detrimental to the health, morals, education, or welfare of the child as determined by the Director of the Division of Labor;

When the child is required to use a dressing room that is simultaneously occupied by an adult or by other children of the opposite sex;

When the child is not provided with a suitable place to rest or play;

When the parent or guardian of the child is prevented from being present at the scene of employment during all the times the child is working;

When the parent or guardian of the child is prevented from being within sight and sound of the child; and

Without a permit issued by the director and the written consent of the child's parent or guardian for the issuance of the permit.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 647, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 5399.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b)(1).

11-12-105. Implementation and enforcement.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall have the authority to:

Promulgate rules for the implementation of this chapter;

Suspend or revoke a permit for the employment of a child in the entertainment industry for cause;

Enter or authorize his or her representative to enter and inspect any place of employment where children work, rest, or play; and

Otherwise enforce and implement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 647, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 843; 2019, No. 910, §
5400.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the introductory language.